Utah statutes.
53A-16-109.   Payment out of tax money by county treasurer.

(1)  Each county treasurer shall pay the appropriate proportionate share of delinquent taxes, together with interest and costs on all tax sales, to each affected school district.

(2)  The treasurer shall make payment as quickly as possible after collection or realization.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

